Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB704.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Grid Stabilization and Security Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Natural gas." As defined under 58 Pa.C.S. § 2301 (relating to definitions).Section 3. Sites suitable for natural gas electric generation projects.123456789101112131415161718 (a) Identification.--The department shall identify economically viable sites for natural gas electric generation projects within this Commonwealth that are:(1) Near producing natural gas wells or pipelines carrying natural gas produced in this Commonwealth capable of supplying and sustaining one or more natural gas electric generation facilities for the economic life of the facilities.(2) Near existing electric transmission infrastructure capable of transmitting the generated electricity to wholesale markets for the benefit of end-user consumers of electricity by one or more natural gas electric generation facilities for the economic life of the facilities.(3) Likely to create economically viable natural gas electric generation projects that provide economic benefits to the Commonwealth, surrounding municipalities and the residents of this Commonwealth.Section 4. Preparation and publication of list.Following identification of economically viable sites for natural gas electric generation projects under section 3, the department shall:(1) Prepare a list of the sites.(2) Submit the list to the Department of Environmental Protection's Bureau of Air Quality.(3) Publish the list on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 5. Air quality.The department shall work in conjunction with the Department of Environmental Protection's Bureau of Air Quality to identify the air quality permits or approvals that may be required for 20250SB0704PN0725 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each site on the list prepared under section 4. The following shall be taken into account when identifying a required air quality permit or approval:(1) Different potential generation sizes.(2) Applicable regional air quality criteria.(3) Anticipated time frame necessary for reviewing and issuing the permit or approval.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0704PN0725 - 3 - 123456789